Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.400

Construction, reconstruction, equipping, and demolition of community college facilities and acquisition of property—Bonds as limited obligation bonds—Additional means to pay principal and interest on.

The bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.50.330 through 28B.50.400 shall not be general obligations of the state of Washington, but shall be limited obligation bonds payable only from the special funds created for their payment. The legislature may specify additional means for providing funds for the payment of principal and interest of said bonds. RCW 28B.50.330 through 28B.50.400 shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for such payment. The power given to the legislature by this section to provide for additional means for raising money is permissive, and shall not in any way be construed as a pledge of the general credit of the state of Washington.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.400. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 40. Formerly RCW 28.85.400.]